Maine, session 132, LD1845.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§68-D is enacted to read:
68-D.
Working Working Waterfront Advisory Council Not Authorized 12 MRSA
Waterfronts §6043
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6043 is enacted to read:
§6043. Working Waterfront Advisory Council
The Working Waterfront Advisory Council, established by Title 5, section 12004-I,
subsection 68-D and referred to in this section as "the council," is established to address
issues facing the State's working waterfronts.
1. Membership. The Director of the Maine Office of Community Affairs, referred to
in this section as "the director," shall appoint up to 15 members to the council who, to the
extent possible, must represent federally recognized Indian nations, tribes or bands in the
State, municipalities, nonprofit organizations, trade organizations, educational institutions,
individuals and industries that represent or use working waterfronts in the State. To the
extent possible, the membership of the council must reflect a geographic distribution along
the coast.
In making appointments, the director shall consider and appoint residents of the State who
have knowledge of problems facing working waterfronts in the State, who have experience
in advocacy relating to working waterfront issues or who provide leadership in programs
or activities that create and improve opportunities or spread awareness related to working
waterfronts and persons that use them.
2. Term. A member's term is for 3 years. If a member is unable to complete the term,
the director shall appoint a member pursuant to subsection 1 to serve out the unexpired
portion of the term.
3. Officers; staff. The officers of the council are the chair and the vice-chair. The
term of the officers is one year. The council shall elect a member of the council for each
officer position at the first regular meeting of each year. The council is staffed by the
program within the Department of Marine Resources for the conservation and development
of the State's coastal resources for the public benefit.
4. Meetings. The council shall meet at least 4 times a year. It may meet at other times
at the call of the chair or the director.
5. Council report. By February 1, 2026 and annually thereafter, the council shall
submit a report to the joint standing committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
economic and community development matters and marine resources matters on the status
of the condition of, the current and future challenges concerning and recommendations
related to working waterfronts in the State, including, but not limited to:
A. How to best use state agencies, municipal governments, working waterfront
industries and citizen groups to protect and improve access to working waterfronts in
the State;
Page 1 - 132LR0025(01)

B. Matters of interest to working waterfront industries and communities in the State,
including, but not limited to, geographic information systems mapping and inventory,
climate and resilience, preservation and access, affordable workforce housing, climate-
driven relocation, water quality and ecosystems, workforce development, health care
access, marine resources economy and economic development, including public-
private partnerships, decarbonization and electrification and developing new working
waterfronts; and
C. Information on relevant existing federal, state, municipal, educational organization
and nonprofit organization data, plans, recommendations and studies that relate to
working waterfronts in the State and updates on progress made in state plans that
include references to working waterfronts.
After reviewing the report, the joint standing committees may report out legislation to
implement any recommendations contained in the report.
6. Director report. By February 1, 2026 and annually thereafter, the director shall
submit a report to the joint standing committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
initiatives proposed by the Maine Office of Community Affairs on the status of initiatives
regarding working waterfronts, including information from coalitions, task forces and
engagements with municipal and tribal governments. After reviewing the report, the joint
standing committees may report out legislation to implement any recommendations
contained in the report.
Sec. 3. Working Waterfront Advisory Council initial membership
appointments. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 12, section 6043,
subsection 2, in making the initial membership appointments to the Working Waterfront
Advisory Council established pursuant to Title 5, section 12004-I, subsection 68-D, the
Director of the Maine Office of Community Affairs shall make the initial membership
appointment terms staggered so that approximately 1/3 of the members are appointed for a
term of 3 years, approximately 1/3 of the members are appointed for a term of 2 years and
approximately 1/3 of the members are appointed for a term of one year.